Arkansas, session 2025, HB1022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2107 is amended to read as follows:
6-15-2107. Arkansas School Recognition Program.
(a) The General Assembly finds that there is a need for an incentive
program for outstanding schools. The General Assembly further finds that
performance-based incentives are commonplace in the private sector and should
be infused into the public sector as a reward for productivity.
(b)(a) The Arkansas School Recognition Program is created to provide
financial awards to public schools and open-enrollment public charter schools
that experience high student performance and those with high student academic
growth, which includes high school graduation rate comparisons for secondary
schools.
(c)(1)(A)(b)(1)(A) If funds are available, a public school or open-
enrollment public charter school shall receive performance-based funding of:
(i) One hundred dollars ($100) per student who
attends the public school or open-enrollment public charter school if:
(a) The public school or public charter school
*TNL009*
01-16-2025 15:05:21 TNL009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1022
is in the top five percent (5%) of all public schools in Arkansas in student
performance under the criteria set forth by rule of the State Board of
Education;
(b) The the public school or open-enrollment
public charter school is in the top five percent (5%) of all public schools
in Arkansas in student academic growth under the criteria set forth by rule
of the state board State Board of Education; or
(c) The public school or public charter school
meets the criteria established by the state board to be used in lieu of the
criteria set forth in subdivisions (c)(1)(A)(i)(a) and (b) of this section
to reward top-performing public schools; or
(ii) Fifty dollars ($50) ($50.00) per student who
attends the public school or open-enrollment public charter school if:
(a) The public school or public charter school
is in the top ten percent (10%) but below the top five percent (5%) of all
public schools in Arkansas in student performance under the criteria set
forth by rule of the state board;
(b) The the public school or open-enrollment
public charter school is in the top ten percent (10%) but below the top five
percent (5%) of all public schools and open-enrollment public charter schools
in Arkansas in student academic growth under the criteria set forth by rule
of the state board; or
(c) The public school or public charter school
meets the criteria established by the state board to be used in lieu of the
criteria set forth in subdivisions (c)(1)(A)(ii)(a) and (b) of this section
to reward high-performing public schools that do not meet the eligibility
criteria set forth in subdivision (c)(1)(A)(i) of this section.
(B) The rewards financial awards listed in subdivision
(c)(1)(A)(b)(1)(A) of this section:
(i) Shall begin after the 2012-2013 state-mandated
assessments; and
(ii) Shall shall be based upon the results of state-
mandated assessments.
(2) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education may
disburse available performance-based funding appropriated for this section by
the General Assembly on a pro rata basis.
01-16-2025 15:05:21 TNL009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1022
(d)(1) All eligible schools shall receive performance-based funding.
(2)(A)(c)(1) Funds shall be distributed under this section to
the public school's or open-enrollment public charter school's fiscal agent
and placed in the public school's or open-enrollment public charter school's
account and shall be used for purposes listed in subsection (e)(d) of this
section as determined by a committee, which shall include:
(i)(A) The principal;
(ii)(B) A teacher elected by the faculty; and
(iii)(C) A parent representative selected by the
local parent-teacher association or some other local parental involvement
group.
(B)(2) The committee shall make its determination under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section by December 15 of each applicable year.
(e)(d) School recognition awards under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be used for the following:
(1) Nonrecurring bonuses to the faculty and staff;
(2) Nonrecurring expenditures for educational equipment or
materials to assist in maintaining and improving student performance; or
(3) Temporary personnel for the public school or open-enrollment
public charter school to assist in maintaining and improving student
performance.
(f)(e) School recognition awards under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section are exempt from §§ 6-17-119 and 6-20-412.
(g)(f) The General Assembly shall appropriate and fund provide
sufficient funds to implement this section.

/s/A. Collins









01-16-2025 15:05:21 TNL009